West Virginia, session 2026, SB1067.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §18-3-14. Extended daycare program for parents of elementary schools. The state superintendent shall establish an Extended Daycare program for parents of elementary children to be held on the elementary campuses of schools.  The program hours shall be from the end of the school day until 6:00 p.m.  The program shall provide for supervision of the students by adults who are paid for by the parents who have children in these schools.